Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1446.03
Committee; expenditure of funds; authorized.

Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act, any committee may, in addition to the expenditures set forth in section 49-1446.01, make expenditures for:

(1) The necessary continued operation of the campaign office or offices of the candidate or political committee;

(2) Social events primarily for the benefit of campaign workers and volunteers or constituents;

(3) Obtaining public input and opinion;

(4) Repayment of campaign loans incurred prior to election day;

(5) Newsletters and other communications for the purpose of information, thanks, acknowledgment, or greetings or for the purpose of political organization and planning;

(6) Gifts of acknowledgment, including flowers and charitable contributions, except that gifts to any one individual shall not exceed fifty dollars in any one calendar year;

(7) Meals, lodging, and travel by an officeholder related to his or her candidacy and for members of the immediate family of the officeholder when involved in activities related to his or her candidacy;

(8) Conference fees, meals, lodging, and travel by an officeholder and his or her staff when involved in activities related to the duties of his or her public office;

(9) In the case of the candidate committee for the Governor, conference fees, meals, lodging, and travel by the Governor, his or her staff, and his or her immediate family, when involved in activities related to the duties of the Governor; and

(10) Security services and systems, including security personnel, hardware, software, electronic security equipment, installation, maintenance, monitoring and other reasonable physical and structural security measures and improvements.

Laws 1981, LB 134, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB986, § 2.
April 15, 2026